Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Oregon Military Department, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for  the following
purposes:
(1) Administration.................... $ 7,908,986
(2) Operations .......................... $ 8,700,661
(3) Emergency management .... $ 13,007,248
(4) Community support............ $ 1,223,752
(5) Debt service........................ $ 13,189,091
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and re-
imbursements from federal service  agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds
not described in this section, collected or received by the Oregon Military Department,  for
the following purposes:
(1) Administration.................... $ 2,907,252
(2) Operations .......................... $ 5,654,113
(3) Emergency management .... $ 138,811,293
(4) Community support ............ $ 5,063,691
(5) Capital improvement .......... $ 200,000
(6) Debt service ........................ $ 100,910
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from federal funds, other than those described  in section 2 of this 2021 Act,
collected or received by the Oregon Military Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Administration.................... $ 517,673
(2) Operations .......................... $ 105,788,658
(3) Emergency management .... $ 1,005,332,920
(4) Community support ............ $ 17,007,219
(5) Capital improvement .......... $ 5,354,100
Enrolled Senate Bill 5535 (SB 5535-A) Page 1
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Military Department by section 1 (4), chapter 534, Oregon  Laws 2019, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2021, for community support, is increased  by $358,378 for state
active duty expenses.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 534, Oregon Laws 2019, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts  and reimbursements from federal service
agreements, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter
534, Oregon Laws 2019, collected or received  by the Oregon Military Department, for com-
munity support, is increased by $386,797 for state active duty expenses.
SECTION 6.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Passed by Senate June 21, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5535 (SB 5535-A) Page 2